Utah statutes.
58-24b-303.   Term of license -- Renewal -- Temporary license for physical
therapist assistant.
(1)  A license issued under this chapter shall be issued in accordance with a
two-year renewal cycle established by rule.  The division may, by rule, extend
or shorten a license renewal process by one year in order to stagger the
renewal cycles that the division administers.
(2)  At the time of license renewal, the licensee shall provide satisfactory
evidence that the licensee completed continuing education competency
requirements, established by the division, by rule.
(3)  If a license renewal cycle is shortened or extended under Subsection (1),
the division shall increase or reduce the required continuing education
competency requirements accordingly.
(4)  A license issued under this chapter expires on the expiration date
indicated on the license, unless the license is renewed under this section.
(5)  Notwithstanding any other provision of this chapter, the division may, by
rule, grant a temporary license, that expires on July 1, 2012, as a physical
therapist assistant to an individual who:
(a)  was working as a physical therapist assistant in Utah before July 1,
2009; and
(b)  complies with the requirements described in Subsections 58-24b-302(2)(a),
(b), (c), (f), and (g).
